District of Columbia statutes.
40-104

Application of proceeds of sale.

The proceeds of such sale shall be applied:

(1)

To the expenses of such sales and the discharge of such lien;

(2)

To payment of other liens, if any, in the order of their priority; and

(3)

To the owner of the property.

History

June 3, 1952, 66 Stat. 97, ch. 361, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 38-204.
1973 Ed., § 38-207.